Utah statutes.
17-53-214.   Seal for county.

The legislative body of each county shall:

(1)  adopt a seal for the county, the impression of which shall contain the words "State of Utah, County of ________________"; and

(2)  file an impression of the seal in the office of the county clerk and with the Division of Archives.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 133, 2000 General Session

